Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.42
Autocycle, defined.

Autocycle means any motor vehicle (1) having a seat that does not require the operator to straddle or sit astride it, (2) designed to travel on three wheels in contact with the ground, (3) having antilock brakes, (4) designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and pedals, and (5) in which the operator and passenger ride either side by side or in tandem in a seating area that is equipped with a manufacturer-installed three-point safety belt system for each occupant and that has a seating area that either (a) is completely enclosed and is equipped with manufacturer-installed airbags and a manufacturer-installed roll cage or (b) is not completely enclosed and is equipped with a manufacturer-installed rollover protection system.

Laws 2015, LB231, § 41;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 117.